Idaho, session 2025, H0004.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-827A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-827A. POWERS AND DUTIES. The office of information technology ser-
vices is hereby authorized and directed:
(1)(a)(i) To control and approve the acquisition and installa-
tion of all telecommunications equipment and facilities for all
departments and institutions of state government, except as pro-
vided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this paragraph;
(ii) To coordinate direct the acquisition and installation of all
telecommunications equipment and facilities for the institutions
of higher education and the elected officers in the executive
branch;
(iii) To coordinate direct the acquisition and installation of all
telecommunications equipment and facilities for the legislative
and judicial branches;
(iv) Provided however, that the acquisition and installation of
all public safety and microwave equipment shall be under the con-
trol of the military division. The military division is autho-
rized to charge and receive payment for actual and necessary ex-
penses incurred in providing services to any unit of state govern-
ment under the provisions of this subparagraph.
(b) In approving or coordinating directing the acquisition or in-
stallation of telecommunications equipment or facilities, the office
shall first consult with and consider the recommendations and ad-
vice of the directors or executive heads of the various departments
or institutions. Any acquisition or installation of any telecommu-
nications equipment or facilities that is contrary to the office's
recommendation, direction or is not in harmony with the state's overall
plan for telecommunications and information sharing, shall be reported
in writing to the governor and the legislature.


(2) To provide a system of telecommunications for all departments and
institutions of state government. Funds received pursuant to this subsec-
tion shall be appropriated for payment of telecommunications and telephone
charges incurred by the various agencies and institutions of state govern-
ment.
(3) To provide a means whereby political subdivisions of the state may
use the state telecommunications system, upon on such terms and under such
conditions as the office of information technology services may establish.
(4) To accept federal funds granted by congress or by executive order
for all or any of the purposes of this chapter, as well as gifts and donations
from individuals and private organizations or foundations.
(5) To oversee implementation of cybersecurity policies to that fos-
ter risk and cybersecurity management telecommunications and decision-mak-
ing with both internal and external organizational stakeholders.
(6) To coordinate and consult with and direct state agencies and offi-
cials regarding information security needs.
(7) To coordinate with direct state agencies and officials on penetra-
tion tests and vulnerability scans of state technology systems in order to
identify steps to mitigate identified risks.
(8) To coordinate with direct state agencies and officials to ensure
that state agencies implement mandatory education and training of state em-
ployees and provide guidance on appropriate levels of training for various
classifications of state employees.
(9) To coordinate with direct appropriate state agencies to create,
coordinate, publish, routinely update and market a statewide cybersecurity
website as an information repository for intelligence-sharing and cyberse-
curity best practices.
(10) To ensure that all state agencies implement and maintain cyberse-
curity best practices.
(11) To require all state agencies to implement and use multifactor
identification to access information technology devices or services, in-
cluding but not limited to local and remote network access to any email
accounts, cloud storage accounts, web applications, networks, databases, or
servers.
(10) (12) To coordinate public and private entities to develop, create
and promote statewide public outreach efforts to protect personal informa-
tion and sensitive data from cyber threats.
(11) (13) To promulgate and adopt reasonable rules for effecting the
purposes of this act pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-831, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-831. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Information technology" means all present and future forms of com-
puter hardware, computer software, and services used or required for auto-
mated data processing, computer-related office automation, or telecommuni-
cations.


(2) "Multifactor identification" means using two (2) or more different
types of identification credentials to achieve authentication. Acceptable
identification credentials include any two (2) or more of the following:
(a) Knowledge-based credentials that require a user to provide infor-
mation that they know such as passwords or personal identification num-
bers;
(b) Possession-based credentials that require an individual to have
something specific in their possession such as security tokens, key
fobs, SIM cards, or smartphone applications; or
(c) Inherence-based credentials that require user-specific biologi-
cal traits to confirm identity for login, such as fingerprints or facial
recognition.
(2) (3) "State agencies" means all state agencies or departments,
boards, commissions, councils, and institutions of higher education but
shall not include the elected constitutional officers and their staffs, the
legislature and its staffs, or the judiciary.
(3) (4) "Telecommunications" means all present and future forms of
hardware, software or services used or required for transmitting voice,
data, video, or images over a distance.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 23, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2362, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2362. USE OF MULTIFACTOR IDENTIFICATION REQUIRED. (1) The legisla-
tive branch and its staff, the judicial branch and its staff, and the elected
constitutional officers and their staffs shall implement the use of multi-
factor identification as that term is defined in section 67-831, Idaho Code.
(2) Multifactor identification shall be required to access informa-
tion technology devices or services as those terms are described in section
67-831, Idaho Code, including but not limited to local and remote network
access to any email accounts, cloud storage accounts, web applications,
networks, databases, or servers.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.